Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1929.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Charles James Kirk, born October 14, 1993, in Arlington Heights, Illinois, was a notable political activist and media personality.(2) At the age of 18, Kirk co-founded Turning Point USA in 2012, an American nonprofit organization that advocates for conservative politics on high school, college and university campuses.(3) Kirk advocated for civil political debate and the right to free speech, focusing on conversation among students in colleges and universities.12345678910111213141516 (4) On September 10, 2025, Kirk was assassinated during a scheduled campus speaking event.(5) In recognition of his work and contributions to America's political dialogue, the President of the United States announced that Kirk would posthumously be awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom.(6) It would be a continuation of Pennsylvania's history of defending the freedom of speech to honor Kirk's work through continued education and advocacy about the benefits of free and open debate.Section 2. Designation.October 14 of each year shall be designated as "Charlie Kirk Day" in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat "Charlie Kirk Day" as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on "Charlie Kirk Day" solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1929PN2428 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021